Washington statutes.
RCW 38.56.080

Emergency responder of a responding member jurisdiction—Tort liability or immunity.

For purposes of tort liability or immunity, an emergency responder of a responding member jurisdiction is considered an agent of the requesting member jurisdiction. No responding member jurisdiction or its officers or employees providing assistance under this chapter is liable for any act or omission while providing or attempting to provide assistance under this chapter in good faith. For purposes of this section, good faith does not include willful misconduct, gross negligence, or recklessness.

[ 2011 c 79 s 8.]